Georgia statutes. 
(c) All documents or other information provided by the applicant in the course of, or in association with, any meetings provided for in this Code section shall be presumed to be confidential and proprietary and a trade secret as such term is defined in Code Section 10-1-761, shall be subject to exemption from disclosure under state and federal law, and shall not be subject to disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-4. Collocation of small wireless facilities and installation, modification, or replacement of associated poles or decorative poles.

Statute text

A wireless provider may collocate small wireless facilities and install, modify, or replace associated poles or decorative poles under this chapter without an agreement with an authority and without an implementing ordinance. An authority may make available to wireless providers rates, fees, and other terms that comply with this chapter and that are adopted by ordinance, resolution, or another document by the authority after public notice. In the absence of an ordinance, a resolution, or another document that complies with this chapter, and until any such ordinance, a resolution, or other document is adopted, if at all, a wireless provider may collocate small wireless facilities and install, modify, or replace associated poles or decorative poles pursuant to the requirements of this chapter. An authority may not require a wireless provider to enter into an agreement to implement this chapter, but nothing in this chapter shall prohibit an authority and a wireless provider from voluntarily entering one or more such agreements, including such agreements with rates, fees, and other terms that differ from those in this chapter; provided, however, that the authority shall make each such agreement available for public inspection and available for adoption upon the same terms and conditions to any requesting wireless provider.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-5. Fees and rates preceding collocation; annual increases; rate changes after changes in federal law; removal; penalty.

Statute text

(a) As a condition to the issuance of a permit to collocate a small wireless facility or to install, modify, or replace a pole or a decorative pole for collocation of a small wireless facility in a right of way, the applicant shall pay the following fees and rates:

(1) A fee for each application for the collocation of each small wireless facility on an existing pole assessed by the authority not to exceed $100.00 per small wireless facility;

(2) A fee for each application for each replacement pole with an associated small wireless facility assessed by the authority not to exceed $250.00;

(3) A fee for each application for each new pole with an associated small wireless facility assessed by the authority not to exceed $1,000.00 per pole with an associated small wireless facility;

(4) An annual right of way occupancy rate assessed by the authority for nonexclusive occupancy of the right of way by the applicant not to exceed:

(A) One hundred dollars per year for each small wireless facility collocated on any existing or replacement pole, including an existing or replacement authority pole; or

(B) Two hundred dollars per year for each new pole, other than a replacement pole, with an associated small wireless facility;

(5) An annual attachment rate for collocations on authority poles not to exceed $40.00 per year per small wireless facility, which shall be nondiscriminatory regardless of the services provided by the collocating wireless provider;

(6) A fee for make-ready work, as provided in subsection (n) of Code Section 36-66C-7; and

(7) Generally applicable nondiscriminatory fees for any permit required under generally applicable law; provided, however, that an applicant shall not be required to obtain or pay any fees for a building permit, as the permit issued pursuant to this chapter serves as a building permit for the applicable poles and small wireless facilities.

(b) The monetary caps provided in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall increase 2.5 percent annually beginning January 1, 2021.

(c) If, in a final adjudication not subject to further appeal or to review by the United States Supreme Court, a federal court reviewing Accelerating Wireless Broadband Deployment by Removing Barriers to Infrastructure Investment, et al., Declaratory Ruling and Third Report and Order, WT Docket No. 17-79 and WC Docket No. 17-84, FCC 18-133 (released September 27, 2018), or a related FCC order, or a Georgia federal district court, the United States Court of Appeals for the Eleventh Circuit, or the United States Supreme Court interpreting 47 U.S.C. Section 253(c) as it existed on January 1, 2019, determines that fair and reasonable compensation includes not only cost based charges but also market based charges with respect to application fees or right of way occupancy rates for the installation of small wireless facilities or poles, or to authority pole attachment rates for small wireless facilities, then:

(1) Beginning on July 1 of the calendar year following the date that the final adjudication is no longer subject to further appeal or to review by the United States Supreme Court, the monetary caps provided in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section for the fees or rates to which the determination applies, excluding any increases that have been made under subsection (b) of this Code section, shall double; and

(2) Beginning on July 1 of the second calendar year following the date that the final adjudication is no longer subject to further appeal or to review by the United States Supreme Court, the monetary caps in paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section for the fees or rates to which the determination applies shall terminate. In place of any monetary caps that terminate pursuant to this subsection, applicants shall pay fees or rates, as each may be applicable, that constitute the fair and reasonable compensation due to the authority under applicable law.

(d) An applicant shall not be subject to any fees or rates other than those expressly provided for by this Code section or as may be otherwise voluntarily negotiated between an applicant and the authority in accordance with Code Section 36-66C-4.

(e) The applicant, or the person that owns or operates the small wireless facility collocated in the right of way, may remove its small wireless facilities at any time from the right of way upon not less than 30 days' prior written notice to the authority and may cease paying to the authority any applicable fees and rates for such use, as of the date of the actual removal of the small wireless facilities. In the event of such removal, the right of way shall be, to the extent practicable in the reasonable judgment of the authority, restored to its condition prior to the removal. If the applicant fails to return the right of way, to the extent practicable in the reasonable judgment of the authority, to its condition prior to the removal within 90 days of the removal, the authority may, at the sole discretion of the authority, restore the right of way to such condition and charge the applicant the authority's reasonable, documented cost of removal and restoration, plus a penalty not to exceed $500.00. The authority may suspend the ability of the applicant to receive any new permits from the authority until the applicant has paid the amount assessed for such restoration costs and the penalty assessed, if any; provided, however, that the authority shall not suspend such ability of any applicant that has deposited the amount in controversy in escrow pending an adjudication of the merits of the dispute by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-5, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-6. Administrative review; public availability of accepted applications; requirements for application; exception to permitting requirements; changes to application information; exclusive arrangements prohibited; neutrality; location within right of way.

Statute text

(a) A wireless provider may collocate small wireless facilities on authority poles and decorative poles in the right of way, subject to administrative review only and the issuance of a permit as set forth in this Code section. Subject to administrative review only and the issuance of a permit as set forth in this Code section, a wireless provider may occupy the right of way for the following uses, provided that such uses shall be in accordance with applicable provisions of this chapter, including without limitation, those set forth in Code Section 36-66C-9:

(1) Collocation of a small wireless facility on or adjacent to a pole or a support structure that does not exceed the limitations set forth in paragraph (3) of subsection (h) of Code Section 36-66C-7 or on or adjacent to a decorative pole in compliance with Code Section 36-66C-12; and

(2) Installation, modification, or replacement of a pole or a decorative pole for collocation of a small wireless facility that does not exceed the limitations set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (h) of Code Section 36-66C-7.

(b) No wireless provider shall collocate any small wireless facility in the right of way or install, modify, or replace a pole or decorative pole for collocation of a small wireless facility in the right of way without first filing an application and obtaining a permit therefor, except as otherwise expressly provided in subsection (e) of this Code section. Any failure to comply with this subsection by a wireless provider shall allow the applicable authority, at the sole discretion of the authority, to restore the right of way, to the extent practicable in the reasonable judgment of the authority, to its condition prior to the unpermitted collocation or installation and to charge the responsible wireless provider its reasonable, documented cost of doing so, plus a penalty not to exceed $1,000.00. The authority may suspend the ability of the wireless provider to receive any new permits from the authority until the wireless provider has paid the amount assessed for such restoration costs and the penalty assessed, if any; provided, however, that the authority shall not suspend such ability of any applicant that has deposited the amount in controversy in escrow pending an adjudication of the merits of the dispute by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) The authority shall make accepted applications publicly available; provided, however, that an applicant may designate portions of its application materials that it reasonably believes contain trade secrets by following the procedures set forth in paragraph (34) of subsection (a) of Code Section 50-18-72.

(d) The application shall be made by the applicable wireless provider or its duly authorized representative and shall contain the following:

(1) The applicant's name, address, telephone number, and email address, including emergency contact information for the applicant;

(2) The names, addresses, telephone numbers, and email addresses of all consultants, if any, acting on behalf of the applicant with respect to the filing of the application;

(3) A general description of the proposed work and the purposes and intent of the proposed facility. The scope and detail of such description shall be appropriate to the nature and character of the physical work to be performed, with special emphasis on those matters likely to be affected or impacted by the physical work proposed;

(4) Detailed construction drawings regarding the proposed use of the right of way;

(5) To the extent the proposed facility involves collocation on a pole, decorative pole, or support structure, a structural report performed by a duly licensed engineer evidencing that the pole, decorative pole, or support structure will structurally support the collocation, or that the pole, decorative pole, or support structure may and will be modified to meet structural requirements, in accordance with applicable codes;

(6) For any new aboveground facilities, visual depictions or representations if such are not included in the construction drawings;

(7) Information indicating the horizontal and approximate vertical location, relative to the boundaries of the right of way, of the small wireless facility for which the application is being submitted;

(8) If the application is for the installation of a pole or replacement of a decorative pole, a certification that complies with subsection (k) of this Code section;

(9) If the small wireless facility will be collocated on a pole or support structure owned by a third party, other than an authority pole or a decorative pole, a certification that the wireless provider has permission from the owner to collocate on the pole or support structure; and

(10) If the applicant is not a wireless services provider, a certification that a wireless services provider has requested in writing that the applicant collocate the small wireless facilities or install, modify, or replace the pole or decorative pole at the requested location.

(e) An application shall not be required for the following activities, provided that a wireless provider may be required to obtain permits for such activities, such as electrical permits or street opening permits, if otherwise required by generally applicable law:

(1) With respect to a pole or decorative pole on which a small wireless facility is collocated, inspections, testing, repairs, and modifications that maintain functional capacity and aesthetic and structural integrity, provided that modifications are limited by the structural load analysis supplied by the applicant in its prior application to the authority; and

(2) With respect to a small wireless facility, inspections, testing, or repairs that maintain functional capacity or the replacement or upgrade of antennas or other components of the small wireless facility such as a swap out or addition of antennas and radio equipment as required by the applicant, with antennas and other components that are substantially similar in color, aggregate size, and other aesthetics to that previously permitted by the authority and consistent with the height and volume limits for small wireless facilities under this chapter, so long as the pole, decorative pole, or support structure will structurally support, or prior to installation will be modified to support, the structural load in accordance with the structural load analysis supplied by the applicant in its prior application to the authority.

(f) An authority shall not require a wireless provider to obtain a permit or any other approval or require fees or rates for the installation, placement, maintenance, operation, or replacement of micro wireless facilities that are suspended on cables that are strung between poles or support structures in the right of way in compliance with applicable codes; provided, however, that an authority may require a wireless provider to obtain permits for any additional activities such as electrical work, excavation, or closure of sidewalks or vehicular lanes within the right of way if otherwise required by generally applicable law. Such permits shall be issued on a nondiscriminatory basis upon terms and conditions applied to any other person's similar activities in the right of way.

(g) Any material change to information contained in an application shall be submitted in writing to the authority within 30 days after the events necessitating the change.

(h) Unless otherwise provided by applicable law, all applications pursuant to this chapter shall be accompanied by the fees required under Code Sections 36-66C-4 and 36-66C-5.

(i) An authority shall not enter into an exclusive arrangement with any person for use of the right of way for the collocation of small wireless facilities or the installation, operation, marketing, modification, maintenance, or replacement of poles or for the right to attach to authority poles. A person that purchases or otherwise acquires an authority pole is subject to the requirements of this subsection.

(j) The authority, in the exercise of its administration and regulation of the management of the right of way, shall be competitively neutral and nondiscriminatory with regard to other users of the right of way.

(k) A wireless provider shall not apply to install a pole or replace a decorative pole unless it has determined after diligent investigation that it cannot meet the service objectives of the permit by collocating on an existing pole or support structure on which:

(1) The wireless provider has the right to collocate subject to reasonable terms and conditions; and

(2) Such collocation would not impose technical limitations or significant additional costs. The wireless provider shall certify that it has made such a determination in good faith, based on the assessment of a licensed engineer, and shall provide a written summary of the basis for such determination.

(l) Requests for installation, modification, or replacement of a support structure are not eligible for administrative review as set forth in this Code section.

(m) An application that is subject to administrative review shall be approved except as provided in subsection (j) of Code Section 36-66C-7.

(n) The provisions of this chapter concerning the collocation of small wireless facilities on poles and the installation, modification, and replacement of poles by wireless providers apply only to poles that are lawfully located or are to be lawfully located within the right of way. An authority has the burden of establishing that an existing pole's location within the right of way is not lawful.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-66C-6, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 236, § 1/SB 66.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - For information as to the effective date of this Code section, see the effective date note at the beginning of this chapter.

36-66C-7. Requirements of authority following receipt of application; notification of time lapse; consolidated application; limitation on installation locations and permits; reconditioning work; time restrictions; imminent risk to public safety; repair of damage; delivery of notice or decision.

Statute text

(a) The requirements of this Code section govern an authority's review of applications for uses that are subject to administrative review as described in subsection (a) of Code Section 36-66C-6.

(b) Within 20 days of receipt of a written application, the authority shall:

(1) Notify the applicant in writing of the commencement and completion dates of any widening, repair, reconstruction, or relocation of the applicable right of way that is scheduled to commence, or is anticipated in good faith to commence, within 24 months after the application is filed;

(2) Notify the applicant, based on the authority's good faith preliminary review of the information provided in the application, of any aspect of the application that appears to be grounds for the authority's denial of the application pursuant to subsection (j) of this Code section; and

(3) Determine whether the application is complete and inform the applicant of its determination in writing. If the authority determines that an application is incomplete, it shall specifically identify to the applicant in writing all missing information within such 20 day period; otherwise the application is deemed complete. If the authority identifies missing information to the applicant as provided in this paragraph, the applicant may submit such missing information to the authority within 20 days of receipt of notification in writing from the authority that the application is incomplete without paying any additional application fee, and any subsequent review of the application by the authority for completeness shall be limited to the previously identified missing information. If the authority determines that an application remains incomplete, or if the authority determines that the applicant has made material changes to the application other than to address the missing information identified by the authority, the authority shall notify the applicant of such determination in writing within ten days of receipt of the resubmission of the written application, and absent an agreement to the contrary between the authority and the applicant that is confirmed by email or other writing, such notice shall constitute a denial of the application. If the authority does not provide such written notification to the applicant within this ten-day period, the application shall be deemed complete.

(c) The authority shall make its final decision to approve or deny the application within 30 days of the written determination that the application is complete or when the application is deemed complete under paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section, whichever is earlier, for a collocation, and within 70 days of the written determination that the application is complete or when the application is deemed complete under paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section, whichever is earlier, for the installation, modification, or replacement of a pole or decorative pole.

(d) A decision to deny an application pursuant to this Code section shall be in writing, shall identify all reasons for the denial, and shall identify the provisions of applicable codes or other standards applicable pursuant to this chapter on which the denial was based. The decision to deny shall be sent to the applicant contemporaneously. The review period shall run until the written decision is delivered to the applicant in accordance with subsection (s) of this Code section.

(e) If the authority fails to act on an application within the review period provided for in subsection (d) of this Code section, the applicant may provide the authority written notice that the time period for acting has lapsed, and the authority shall then have 20 days after receipt of such notice to render its written decision. The application shall be deemed approved by passage of time and operation of law if the authority does not render its written decision within such 20 days.

(f) An applicant may, at the applicant's discretion and subject to the consolidated application requirements and processes under Code Section 36-66C-13, file a consolidated application.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and to the extent that an application constitutes an eligible facilities request, the authority shall not deny the application and shall approve the application within 60 days according to the procedures established under 47 C.F.R. 1.40001(c).

(h) Small wireless facilities and new, modified, or replacement poles to be used for collocation of small wireless facilities may be placed in the right of way as a permitted use in accordance with Code Section 36-66C-6, subject to applicable codes and the following requirements:

(1) Each such new, modified, or replacement pole installed in the right of way in a historic district and in an area zoned primarily for residential use shall not exceed 50 feet above ground level;

(2) Each such new, modified, or replacement pole installed in the right of way not in historic district or in an area zoned primarily for residential use shall not exceed the greater of:

(A) Fifty feet above ground level; or

(B) Ten feet greater in height above ground level than the tallest existing pole in the same authority right of way in place as of January 1, 2019, and located within 500 feet of the new proposed pole; and

(3) New small wireless facilities in the right of way shall not exceed:

(A) For a collocation on an existing pole or support structure, more than ten feet above the existing pole or support structure; or

(B) For a collocation on a new, modified, or replacement pole under paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection, the height limit provided in such paragraphs.

(i) (1) A wireless provider shall comply with reasonable and nondiscriminatory requirements that prohibit communications service providers and electric service providers from installing poles in a right of way in an area designated solely for underground or buried facilities of communications service providers and electric service providers where the authority:

(A) Has required all such facilities other than light poles and attachments to be placed underground and all such undergrounding has been completed prior to the submission of the application, or, for rights of way where such facilities other than light poles and attachments have not been deployed, has in effect a reasonable and nondiscriminatory zoning or development ordinance or regulation that requires such facilities other than light poles and attachments to be placed underground;

(B) Does not prohibit the replacement of light poles or the collocation of small wireless facilities in the designated area; and

(C) Permits wireless providers to seek a waiver of the underground requirements for the placement of a new pole to support small wireless facilities, which waivers shall be addressed in a nondiscriminatory manner and consistent with applicable law.

(2) An authority that adopts undergrounding requirements shall:

(A) Allow a wireless provider to maintain in place any previously collocated small wireless facilities subject to any applicable pole attachment agreement; or

(B) Either allow the wireless provider to replace the pole associated with previously collocated small wireless facilities at the same location or propose an alternate location within 50 feet of the prior location, which the wireless provider shall use unless such alternate location imposes technical limits or significant additional costs.

(j) An authority shall approve an application for permitted uses described in subsection (a) of Code Section 36-66C-6 unless the requested collocation of a small wireless facility or the requested installation, modification, or replacement of a pole or decorative pole:

(1) Interferes with the operation of traffic control equipment;

(2) Interferes with sight lines or clear zones for transportation or pedestrians;

(3) Fails to comply with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101, et seq., or similar laws of general applicability regarding pedestrian access or movement;

(4) Requests that ground-mounted small wireless facility equipment be located more than 7.5 feet in radial circumference from the base of the pole, decorative pole, or support structure to which the small wireless facility antenna would be attached, provided that the authority shall not deny the application if a greater distance from the base of the pole, decorative pole, or support structure is necessary to avoid interfering with sight lines or clear zones for transportation or pedestrians or to otherwise protect public safety;

(5) Fails to comply with applicable codes;

(6) Fails to comply with the maximum limitations set forth in subsection (h) of this Code section or the requirements of subsection (i) of this Code section;

(7) With respect to an application to install a pole or decorative pole, interferes with the widening, repair, reconstruction, or relocation of a public road or highway by an authority or the Department of Transportation that has been advertised for bid and scheduled for completion within six months after the application is filed;

(8) With respect to an application to install a pole or decorative pole, interferes with a public works construction project governed by Chapter 91 of Title 36 and scheduled for completion within six months after the application is filed;

(9) Fails to comply with Code Section 36-66C-10, 36-66C-11, or 36-66C-12;

(10) Fails to comply with laws of general applicability that address pedestrian and vehicular traffic and safety requirements; or

(11) Fails to comply with laws of general applicability that address the occupancy or management of the right of way and that are not otherwise inconsistent with this chapter.

(k) (1) A permit from the authority authorizes an applicant to undertake only certain activities in accordance with this chapter and shall not create a property right or grant authorization or license to the applicant to impinge upon the rights of other persons that may already have an interest in the right of way.

(2) Collocation, installation, modification, or replacement for which a permit is issued under this chapter shall be completed within six months after issuance, provided that an extension shall be granted for up to an additional six months upon written request made to the authority before the end of the initial six-month period if a delay results from circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the applicant. Issuance of a permit authorizes the applicant to:

(A) Undertake the collocation, installation, modification, or replacement approved by the permit; and

(B) Operate and maintain the small wireless facilities and any associated pole covered by the permit for a period of not less than ten years, which shall be renewed for equivalent durations so long as the applicant is in compliance with the criteria set forth in subsection (j) of this Code section, subject to the relocation requirements described in subsection (l) of this Code section and the applicant's right to terminate at any time.

(l) If, in the reasonable exercise of police powers, an authority requires widening, repair, reconstruction, or relocation of a public road or highway, or relocation of poles, support structures, or small wireless facilities is required as a result of a public project, a wireless provider shall relocate poles and support structures that such wireless provider has installed in the right of way for the collocation of small wireless facilities pursuant to this chapter at no cost to the authority in the event that such poles and support structures are found by the authority to unreasonably interfere with the widening, repair, reconstruction, or relocation project or the public project. If widening, repair, reconstruction, or relocation is required as a condition or result of a project by a person other than an authority, such person shall bear the cost of relocating such poles or support structures and any communications facilities on such poles or support structures. The wireless provider shall relocate the poles or support structures:

(1) By the date designated in a written notice from the authority that contains a good faith estimate by the authority of the date by which the authority intends to commence work, whenever the authority has determined that such removal, relocation, change, or alteration is reasonably necessary for the construction, repair, maintenance, or installation of any authority improvement or operations in or upon the right of way so long as the same time frames are applied to all utilities in the right of way; provided, however, that the date designated for relocation shall be at least 45 days after the authority provides the written notice to the wireless provider; or

(2) Within the time frame that the wireless provider estimates in good faith is reasonably needed to complete the relocation, so long as the wireless provider provides the authority written notice of its good faith estimate within 30 days following receipt of the written notice provided by the authority pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and explains in detail why such wireless provider cannot reasonably complete the relocation by the date designated in the authority's written notice.

(m) (1) The wireless provider shall reasonably cooperate with the authority to carry out reconditioning work activities in a manner that minimizes interference with the wireless provider's approved use of the facility.

(2) The authority shall use reasonable efforts to provide the wireless provider with written notice of reconditioning work at least 120 days before such reconditioning work begins. Upon receiving such notice, it shall be the wireless provider's sole responsibility to provide adequate measures to cover, remove, or otherwise protect the wireless provider's communications facility from the consequences of the reconditioning work, including but not limited to paint and debris fallout. The authority reserves the right to require the wireless provider to remove all of the wireless provider's communications facilities from the authority pole and surrounding premises during reconditioning work, provided that the requirement to remove such is contained in the written notice required by this Code section. All costs associated with the protection measures, including temporary removal, shall be the sole responsibility of the wireless provider. If the authority fails in good faith to give notice within at least 120 days, it shall not affect the authority's rights under this subsection. In all cases, as much notice as possible shall be provided, but less than 30 days' notice shall be prohibited. The authority shall provide the wireless provider with a date by which its equipment must be protected or removed.

(3) The wireless provider may request a modification of the authority procedures for carrying out reconditioning work in order to reduce interference with the wireless provider's operation of its communications facility. If the authority agrees to the modification, the wireless provider shall be responsible for all reasonable incremental costs related to the modification.

(4) The authority shall provide the wireless provider with at least 120 days written notice of any replacement work before the authority may remove the wireless provider's communications facilities. The authority shall also promptly notify the wireless provider when the authority poles have been replaced and the wireless provider can reinstall its equipment. During the replacement work, the wireless provider may maintain a temporary communications facility on the property, or after approval by an authority on any land owned or controlled by an authority in the vicinity of the property. If the property will not accommodate the wireless provider's temporary communications facility or if the parties cannot agree on a temporary location, the wireless provider, at its sole discretion, shall have the right to suspend the applicable permit until the replacement pole is installed, upon 30 days' written notice to the authority.

(n) For any collocation on authority poles in the right of way, the authority shall provide a good faith estimate for any make-ready work necessary to enable the authority pole to support the proposed facility, including replacement of the pole if necessary, within 60 days after receipt of a completed application requesting attachment to the authority pole. Alternatively, the authority may require the wireless provider to perform the make-ready work and notify the wireless provider of such within the 60 day period. If the wireless provider or its contractor performs the make-ready work, the wireless provider shall indemnify the authority for any negligence by the wireless provider or its contractor in the performance of such make-ready work, the work shall not be deemed to violate Chapter 91 of this title, and the work shall otherwise comply with applicable law. If the authority opts to perform the make-ready work itself, the authority shall complete the work, including any pole replacement, within 90 days of receipt of written acceptance of the good faith estimate by the wireless provider. Such acceptance shall be signified by payment via check or other commercially reasonable and customary means specified by the authority. The authority may require that the replacement authority pole have the same functionality as the pole being replaced. If the authority pole is replaced, the authority shall operate authority fixtures on the pole, and, absent an agreement to the contrary between the authority and the wireless provider that is confirmed in writing, the authority shall take ownership of the new pole.

(o) If the wireless provider fails to relocate a support structure or pole or fails to provide a written good faith estimate of the time needed to relocate a support structure or pole within the time period prescribed in subsection (l) of this Code section, the authority shall have the right and privilege, ten days or more after the wireless provider receives written notice from the authority, to cut power to or move any support structure or pole located within the right of way, as the authority may determine to be necessary, appropriate, or useful in order to commence work on the public project.

(p) (1) If a wireless provider decides to abandon any small wireless facility, support structure, or pole, it shall notify the authority in writing as soon as practicable, but no later than 30 days prior to the abandonment. Following receipt of such notice, the authority shall instruct the wireless provider in writing to remove all or any portion of the small wireless facility, support structure, or pole if the authority determines that such removal will be in the best interest of public safety and welfare. If the wireless provider fails to remove the abandoned small wireless facility, support structure, or pole within 90 days after such notice, the authority may do so and recover the actual and reasonable expenses of doing so from the wireless provider, its successors, or its assigns, plus a penalty not to exceed $500.00. The authority may suspend the ability of the wireless provider, its successors, or its assigns, as applicable, to receive any new permits from the authority until the wireless provider, its successors, or its assigns, as applicable, have paid the amount assessed for such removal costs and the penalty assessed, if any; provided, however, that the authority shall not suspend such ability of any applicant that has deposited the amount in controversy in escrow pending an adjudication of the merits of the dispute by a court of competent jurisdiction. Nothing in this chapter precludes an authority from adopting reasonable and nondiscriminatory requirements that are not inconsistent with this subsection with respect to the removal of abandoned small wireless facilities, support structures, or poles.
